Utah statutes.
76-10-3003.   Corporation guilty of unfair discrimination -- Action by attorney general.

If complaint is made to the attorney general that any corporation is guilty of unfair discrimination as defined by the preceding section, he shall investigate the complaint, and for that purpose, he may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, take testimony, and require the production of books or other documents, and, if in his opinion sufficient grounds exist therefor, he may prosecute an action in the name of the state in the proper court to annul the charter or revoke the license of the corporation, as the case may be, and to permanently enjoin the corporation from doing business in this state, and, if in the action the court finds that the corporation is guilty of unfair discrimination as defined by the preceding section, the court shall annul the charter or revoke the license of the corporation and may permanently enjoin it from transacting business in this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

